Alabama, session 2026rs, SB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The Legislature finds and declares that
oyster shell material is a beneficial natural resource for
local water quality, aquatic habitats, and the protection of
the coastline of this state. An income tax credit for
restaurants that participate in approved oyster recycling
programs would incentivize the facilitation of more of this
resource to the benefit of the state.
Section 2. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Revenue.
(2) INCOME TAX. The tax imposed by Chapter 18 of Title
40, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) OYSTER SHELL RECYCLING PROGRAM. The Oyster Shell
Page 1

(3) OYSTER SHELL RECYCLING PROGRAM. The Oyster Shell
SB125 INTRODUCED
Recycling Program or any other oyster shell recycling program
or activity designated by rule by the Alabama Department of
Revenue as an approved program or activity.
(4) RESTAURANT. A facility that prepares and sells food
directly to consumers for immediate consumption.
(b)(1) A restaurant that donates oyster shell material
to an oyster shell recycling program may claim a credit
against the state income tax liability as provided by this
section. The amount of the credit shall equal the lesser of:
a. One dollar ($1) for every 50 pounds of oyster shell
material donated to a qualifying oyster shell recycling
program or activity during the tax year; or
b. Two thousand dollars ($2,000).
(2) The total amount of credits granted shall not
exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per calendar
year.
(3) a. The granting of tax credits authorized by this
section shall be on a first-come, first-served basis.
b. The department, by rule, shall provide for any
credits not granted due to the cap provided in subdivision (2)
to receive first priority in the subsequent tax year.
(c) If the amount of the credit exceeds the amount of
the taxpayer's tax liability for the taxable year, the excess
tax credit amount shall constitute an overpayment as defined
in Section 40-18-79, Code of Alabama 1975, and the department
shall refund the overpayment from the collections of the taxes
imposed.
(d) No tax credit provided by this section may be
Page 2

(d) No tax credit provided by this section may be
SB125 INTRODUCED
transferred or sold to another taxpayer.
(e) Any taxpayer claiming the credit shall maintain all
records necessary to verify his or her eligibility for the
credit and for the amount of credit claimed. Upon request, a
taxpayer shall submit to the department any records required
to be maintained by this section in connection with the filing
of the income tax return.
(f) The credit authorized in this section may be
claimed by corporations, individuals, and other entities in
accordance with the following provisions:
(1) An entity taxed as a corporation for Alabama income
tax purposes shall claim any credit authorized by this section
on its corporation income tax return.
(2) An individual shall claim any credit authorized by
this section on its income tax return.
(3) An entity that is not taxed as a corporation shall
claim any credit authorized by this section on the returns of
the partners or members in accordance with the following
requirements:
a. Corporate partners or members shall claim their
share of the credit, respectively, on their corporation income
tax returns.
b. Individual partners or members shall claim their
share of the credit, respectively, on their individual income
tax returns.
(g) The department shall adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this section. The department shall engage and
collaborate with the Commissioner of the Department of
Page 3

collaborate with the Commissioner of the Department of
SB125 INTRODUCED
Conservation and Natural Resources and may incorporate
recommendations of the commissioner in any rules designating
oyster shell recycling programs and activities.
(h) The tax credit allowed under this section may be
claimed beginning with the 2026 tax year and may not be
claimed for tax years after the 2030 tax year.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 4